Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.523

Death benefits—Members not qualified for benefits under RCW 41.32.522 and retired former members.

Upon receipt of proper proof of death of a member who does not qualify for the death benefit of six hundred dollars under RCW 41.32.522, or a former member who was retired for age, service, or disability, a death benefit of four hundred dollars shall be paid to the member's estate or to the persons, trust, or organization as he or she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department or to the persons as may otherwise qualify as the beneficiary pursuant to RCW 41.32.520: PROVIDED, That the member or the retired former member had established not less than ten years of credit with the retirement system for full time Washington membership service.

[ 1995 c 144 s 11; 1992 c 212 s 5; 1991 c 35 s 60; 1974 ex.s. c 193 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 150 s 19; 1967 c 50 s 9; 1965 ex.s. c 81 s 7; 1963 ex.s. c 14 s 21.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Emergency—Severability—1974 ex.s. c 193: See notes following RCW 41.32.310.

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 150: See note following RCW 41.50.200.

Effective date—Severability—1967 c 50: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.

Savings—Effective date—Severability—1963 ex.s. c 14: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.